Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Liens on Boats

66-19-201. Possessory lien on boats.

Any debt contracted by the master, owner, agent, or consignee of any boat within this state on account of any work done, or materials or articles furnished for the building, repairing, fitting, furnishing, or equipping of such boat, or for wages due to the employees of such debtor, or for lease rent for dockage or storage, shall be a possessory lien upon such boat, its tackle, and furniture. It is the legislative intent that the holder of a material and furnishings lien shall not be able to charge additional dockage and storage during that period when the holder is exercising this lien.

Code 1858, § 1991 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 1); Shan., § 3547; mod. Code 1932, § 7962; Acts 1981, ch. 482, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1904.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority of Conditional Vendor's Lien Over Warehousemen's Lien, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 202 (1930).

66-19-202. Pleading of lienor.

The pleading of the lienor shall be in writing, on oath, stating:

By whom and for what boat the debt was contracted;

The items composing the debt;

That it is justly due and unpaid; and

That demand has been made of one (1) of the defendants, or of the captain or agent of the defendants, being at the time in the county.

Code 1858, § 3551 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, §§ 2, 10); Shan., § 5314; mod. Code 1932, § 7963; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1905.

66-19-203. Joinder of plaintiffs in suit.

Any two (2) or more of such creditors or claimants may join in the same warrant; and any such who has not joined may be made a party plaintiff in the suit, on motion, before the trial; and in such case the party shall be liable in all things, just as the party would have been had the party originally joined in the suit.

Code 1858, § 3557 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 5); Shan., § 5320; mod. Code 1932, § 7967; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1906.

Cross-References. Permissive joinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 6.

66-19-204. Plaintiffs' bond.

Before issuing process against the boat, the judge or clerk shall take bond, with security, from the plaintiff or complainant, in the penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), payable to the defendant, conditioned to prosecute the suit with effect, or to pay all costs and damages to the defendant, and all claimants subsequently applying to be made parties to the suit shall first be required to sign the bond before being admitted as plaintiffs or complainants.

Code 1858, § 3553 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 10); Shan., § 5316; mod. Code 1932, § 7964; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1907.

66-19-205. Warrant to attach boat.

Following the taking of the bond provided for in §66-19-204, the judge shall issue the process, against the owners of the boat, or some of them, and direct it to the sheriff of the county, commanding the sheriff to attach the boat, its furniture and tackle, or so much thereof as may be necessary, and safely keep the same until security is given, or further order of the court.

Code 1858, § 3554 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 2); Shan., § 5317; mod. Code 1932, § 7965; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1908.

66-19-206. Retention of possession by sheriff.

The sheriff, after seizing the property, shall retain possession of it until the termination of the action, unless bond and security are given in a penalty as prescribed by statute, payable to the plaintiff or complainant conditioned to abide by and perform the judgment of the court.

Code 1858, § 3555 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 3); Shan., § 5318; mod. Code 1932, § 7966; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1909.

66-19-207. Duplication of attachments prohibited.

After a seizure of a boat at the suit of one (1) or more creditors and/or claimants, no other creditors and/or claimants shall have process to attach the boat, but all of them may be made parties, as prescribed in §66-19-203.

Code 1858, § 3558 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 7); Shan., § 5321; mod. Code 1932, § 7968; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1910.

66-19-208. Sale of boat.

If no bond has been given, the court shall, at the appearance term, order the boat, or such part of the furniture and tackle as may be sufficient, to be sold for the satisfaction of the judgment; and the sheriff shall accordingly sell the same, first advertising the time and place of sale at least ten (10) days prior to the sale.

Code 1858, § 3560 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 6); Shan., § 5323; Code 1932, § 7969; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1911.

66-19-209. Protection of prior liens.

Where there are prior liens on the boat by judgments obtained by the general creditors of the owners, the sheriff shall attach the boat, subject to such prior liens, and when the boat is sold to satisfy such prior liens, the surplus, if any, shall be paid into court, where the attachment is pending, to be paid to the attaching creditors, if they obtain judgment.

Code 1858, § 3561 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 8); Shan., § 5324; Code 1932, § 7970; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1912.

66-19-210. Apportionment of proceeds of sale.

If the proceeds of the boat, tackle, and furniture are not sufficient to pay off all the creditors who have joined in the suit, the proceeds shall be ratably divided among them.

Code 1858, § 3562 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 35, § 9); Shan., § 5325; Code 1932, § 7971; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1913.

66-19-211. Wharfage lien.

The owners and/or proprietors of wharves and landings, where wharfage is allowed by law, have a lien on boats, rafts, and other water crafts, and their loading, for the payment of their wharfage fees, and the same may be enforced by attachment within three (3) months after the lien accrued.

Code 1858, § 1993; Shan., § 3549; Code 1932, § 7972; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1914.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

66-19-212. Marina lien — Definitions.

A marina shall be entitled to a lien upon any vessel or personal watercraft, which lawfully comes into the marina's possession and is retained pending payment of all reasonable charges due. IF three (3) months or more have elapsed since the contractually-prescribed due date for payment of such charges, THEN the marina may enforce such lien in the manner prescribed for the enforcement of artisans' liens under §§ 66-14-102 — 66-14-106, after reasonable inquiry and notice to interested parties.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,

IF, in the case of a personal watercraft, the marina submits a search request for the filing of a security interest under the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9; OR, in the case of a vessel, the marina submits a search request to the United States coast guard; AND

IF, thereafter, the marina sends, by certified mail, return receipt requested, notice of intent to enforce the lien to all known owners, all known interested parties, and to any other owner or interested party discernible through reasonable effort; AND

IF, thereafter, the marina advertises notice of intent to enforce the lien at least once a week for two (2) or more consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the locality where the sale is to be held; THEN

For purposes of subsection (a), there shall be a rebuttable presumption of reasonable inquiry and notice to interested parties.

In addition to the method of enforcement authorized by this section, the lien may be enforced, in the alternative, by the marina complying with the provisions contained in the other sections of this part.

As used in this section:

“Marina” means a marina, boat dock, dry dock, or dry storage facility;

“Personal watercraft” has the same meaning as this term is defined in § 69-9-501; and

“Vessel” has the same meaning as this term is defined in § 69-9-204.

Acts 2001, ch. 210, § 1.

66-19-213. Marina's lien on floating cabin.

A marina has a lien on a floating cabin for any assessment levied against the floating cabin pursuant to a written lease or service contract between the marina and the owner of the floating cabin from the time the assessment becomes due, which lien may be enforced by judicial action.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), a written lease or service contract between a marina and the owner of a floating cabin may provide that the marina's lien may be enforced in like manner as a security interest under title 47, chapter 9, if the marina gives notice of its action to the owner and to all lienholders of record.

Notice shall be deemed sufficient if sent by United States mail, postage prepaid:

If to the owner, at the address of the floating cabin, or, if different, the last address for the owner on file with the marina; or

If to a lienholder, other interested party, or the nominee of record, at the address set forth in an instrument of record; or, if different, at such other address as the lienholder or other interested party may have on file with the marina.

Notice shall be deemed received three (3) days after deposit in the United States mail, postage prepaid. Fees, service charges, late charges, fines, and interest are enforceable as assessments under this section unless the written lease or service contract between the marina and the owner of the floating cabin provides otherwise. If an assessment is payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment of the assessment becomes due.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a floating cabin, except:

Liens and encumbrances recorded before the date of the written lease or service contract between the marina and the owner of the floating cabin;

A first or purchase money lien recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and

Liens for taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the floating cabin.

Upon a foreclosure action initiated by a lienholder or the marina under title 47, chapter 9, the marina is entitled to a priority in the proceeds from the foreclosure sale to satisfy the lien under subsection (a) up to the extent of the assessments that are past due during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding institution of an action to enforce the lien. However, notwithstanding this subsection (b) or any law to the contrary:

Any foreclosure by the marina of its lien for assessments shall be subject to any prior lien encumbering the floating cabin and shall not extinguish such lien;

Upon any foreclosure and sale by the holder of a security interest, the sale and foreclosure will be subject to the marina lien up to the payment priority amount set forth in this subdivision (b)(2); and

Any right of foreclosure or priority of the marina shall not be transferable and shall be extinguished if assigned or transferred to a third party.

If two (2) or more marinas have liens for assessments at any time on the same floating cabin, the priority of the liens shall be determined based on the date that each lien was created, with an earlier created lien having priority over a later created lien.

A lien for any delinquent assessment under this section up to the priority in payment provided in subdivision (b)(2) is perfected without recording. Any other delinquent amount above the priority of payment provided in subdivision (b)(2) is perfected by filing a financing statement with the secretary of state, and shall have priority over any subsequently filed liens.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within one (1) year after the date the lien for the assessment becomes effective.

A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section may include costs and reasonable attorney's fees for the prevailing party.

The marina, upon written request, shall furnish to an owner or to a holder of any security interest encumbering the floating cabin, or the owner's or holder's respective authorized agents, a written statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against the floating cabin. The statement must be furnished within seven (7) days after receipt of the written request and is binding on the marina.

As used in this section:

“Floating cabin” means a watercraft or other floating structure:

Primarily designed and used for human habitation or occupation; and

Not primarily designed or used for navigation or transportation on water; and

“Marina” means a marina, boat dock, dry dock, or dry storage facility.

Acts 2017, ch. 314, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 314, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to charges accruing against floating cabins or after July 1, 2017.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 314, § 2. July 1, 2017.